District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.06

Administration of medication in emergency circumstances.

(a)

No employee or agent of a school shall administer medication in emergency circumstances to any student unless he or she has been trained and certified pursuant to § 38-651.04.

(b)

The Mayor shall obtain a standing order signed by at least one practicing physician licensed in the District that identifies the specific medications that may be administered in emergency circumstances and provides appropriate administration instructions.

(c)

A student need not have a known diagnosis or a medication action plan to receive treatment in emergency circumstances from a trained employee or agent of the school.

(d)

The Mayor shall develop a procedure by which the responsible person may request that a minor student not receive treatment in emergency circumstances.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 7, 54 DCR 12230
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-77, § 2(d), 63 DCR 756
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-77 would have substituted “the student” for “a minor student” in (d).
Delegation of Authority to the Student Access to Treatment Act of 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2008-85, June 11, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9362).
Applicability of D.C. Law 21-77: Section 4 of D.C. Law 21-77 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.